Georgia, session 2025_26, HB572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide a new charter for the Town of Braselton, approved June 3, 2003 (Ga. L.
2003, p. 4319), is amended by adding a new subsection to Section 1.11 to read as follows:
"(d) In addition to the other provisions of this section, the corporate limits of the town shall
include the following described properties, as described in the records of the Barrow
County Board of Tax Assessors on the effective date of this subsection:
Barrow County Parcel ID XX023 013
Barrow County Parcel ID XX0025 053
Barrow County Parcel ID XX025 054
Barrow County Parcel ID XX023 014
Barrow County Parcel ID XX025 052
Barrow County Parcel ID XX025 051
H. B. 572
- 1 -

LC 47 3295/AP
Barrow County Parcel ID XX025 050
Barrow County Parcel ID XX023 020
Barrow County Parcel ID XX023 002
Barrow County Parcel ID XX021 008
Barrow County Parcel ID XX021 008A
Barrow County Parcel ID XX021 008B
Barrow County Parcel ID XX021 008C"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 572
- 2 -